Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1813YH (2) 91 dg/ko H.F. 343 Section 1. Section 237A.13, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 5. The departmentâs billing and payment provisions for 3 the program shall allow providers to elect either biweekly or 4 monthly billing and payment for child care provided under the 5 program. The department shall pay providers based on full-day 6 rates for each day the provider cared for a child enrolled in 7 the program, regardless of whether the child remained in the 8 providerâs care for the full day. The department shall remit 9 payment to a provider within ten business days of receiving 10 a bill or claim for services provided. However, if the 11 department determines that a bill has an error or omission, the 12 department shall notify the provider of the error or omission 13 and identify any correction needed before issuance of payment 14 to the provider. The department shall provide the notice 15 within five business days of receiving the billing from the 16 provider and shall remit payment to the provider within ten 17 business days of receiving the corrected billing. 18